Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.140

Penalty for maintaining unlicensed ferry.

Any person who maintains any ferry and receives ferriage without first obtaining a license therefor shall pay a fine of ten dollars for each offense, to be collected for the use of the county, by suit before any district judge having jurisdiction, and any person may bring such suit: PROVIDED, That it shall not be unlawful for any person to transport any other person or property over any stream for hire, when there is no ferry, or the ferry established at such place was not in actual operation at the time, or in sufficient repair to have afforded to such person or property a safe and speedy passage.

[ 1987 c 202 s 210; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.140. Prior: Code 1881 s 3015; 1879 p 64 s 51; 1869 p 284 s 53; 1863 p 525 s 13; 1854 p 356 s 13; RRS s 5475.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.